Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1302
Railroad transportation safety district; formation; purpose.

Whenever, in a county in which is located a city or cities of the primary or first class, it will be conducive to the public health, safety, convenience, or welfare (1) to move, relocate, or remove any railroad tracks or railroad right-of-way, including improvements, (2) to relocate or remove any railroad yard, switch yard, or switch tracks, (3) to change, construct, eliminate, or reconstruct, including the use of protective devices of any kind or nature, any highway or street crossing of a railroad property, (4) to move, construct, or reconstruct any railroad bridge, viaduct, or subway, (5) to acquire, negotiate, sell, or eliminate any joint trackage operating rights or any rights of other individuals or entities over, in, or on any railroad tracks, rights-of-way, switch yards, or switch tracks, or (6) to do any two or more of the activities listed in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this section, a special district to be known as a railroad transportation safety district may be formed and may proceed, as provided in sections 74-1301 to 74-1308, for the purpose of inaugurating, developing, and negotiating for programs which may involve the constructing, reconstructing, leasing, maintaining, or selling of such work or works of public transportation improvement.

Laws 1971, LB 919, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 188, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 65, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 80, § 1.